Utah statutes.
53A-6-209.   Effective date -- Withdrawal from compact -- Continuing obligations.

(1)  This compact shall become effective when enacted into law by two states.  Thereafter it shall become effective as to any state upon its enactment of this compact.

(2)  Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states.

(3)  No withdrawal shall relieve the withdrawing state of any obligation imposed upon it by a contract to which it is a party.  The duration of contracts and the methods and conditions of withdrawal therefrom shall be those specified in their terms.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

